Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6304
Disclosure; when required; nonconsolidated basis.

(1) No acquisitions or dispositions of assets need be reported pursuant to section 44-6303 if the acquisitions or dispositions are not material. A material acquisition, or the aggregate of any series of related acquisitions during any thirty-day period, or material disposition, or the aggregate of any series of related dispositions during any thirty-day period, shall mean one that is nonrecurring and not in the ordinary course of business and involves more than five percent of the reporting insurer's total admitted assets as reported in its most recent financial statement filed with the director pursuant to section 44-322.

(2) Asset acquisitions subject to the Disclosure of Material Insurance Transactions Act shall include every purchase, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, succession, or other acquisition other than the construction or development of real property by or for the reporting insurer or the acquisition of materials for such purpose. Asset dispositions subject to the act shall include every sale, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, mortgage, hypothecation, assignment, whether for the benefit of creditors or otherwise, abandonment, destruction, or other disposition.

(3) The following information shall be disclosed in any report of a material acquisition or disposition of assets:

(a) Date of the transaction;

(b) Manner of acquisition or disposition;

(c) Description of the assets involved;

(d) Nature and amount of the consideration given or received;

(e) Purpose of or reason for the transaction;

(f) Manner by which the amount of consideration was determined;

(g) Gain or loss recognized or realized as a result of the transaction; and

(h) Name of the person from whom the assets were acquired or to whom they were disposed.

(4) Insurers shall report material acquisitions and dispositions on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers which utilizes a pooling arrangement or one-hundred-percent reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer's reserves and such insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is deemed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if the insurer has less than one million dollars total direct plus assumed written premiums during a calendar year that are not subject to a pooling arrangement and the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than five percent of the insurer's capital and surplus.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 4.